Illinois, session 104th, HB3753.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Prevailing Wage Act is amended by changing 5Sections 2 and 3 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 130/2)7    Sec. 2. This Act applies to the wages of laborers, 8mechanics and other workers employed in any public works, as 9hereinafter defined, by any public body and to anyone under 10contracts for public works. This includes any maintenance, 11repair, assembly, or disassembly work performed on equipment 12whether owned, leased, or rented.13    As used in this Act, unless the context indicates 14otherwise:15    "Public works" means all fixed works constructed or 16demolished by any public body, or paid for wholly or in part 17out of public funds. "Public works" as defined herein includes 18all projects financed in whole or in part with bonds, grants, 19loans, or other funds made available by or through the State or 20any of its political subdivisions, including but not limited 21to: bonds issued under the Industrial Project Revenue Bond Act 22(Article 11, Division 74 of the Illinois Municipal Code), the 23Industrial Building Revenue Bond Act, the Illinois Finance   HB3753- 2 -LRB104 10561 SPS 20637 b1Authority Act, the Illinois Sports Facilities Authority Act, 2or the Build Illinois Bond Act; loans or other funds made 3available pursuant to the Build Illinois Act; loans or other 4funds made available pursuant to the Riverfront Development 5Fund under Section 10-15 of the River Edge Redevelopment Zone 6Act; or funds from the Fund for Illinois' Future under Section 76z-47 of the State Finance Act, funds for school construction 8under Section 5 of the General Obligation Bond Act, funds 9authorized under Section 3 of the School Construction Bond 10Act, funds for school infrastructure under Section 6z-45 of 11the State Finance Act, and funds for transportation purposes 12under Section 4 of the General Obligation Bond Act. "Public 13works" also includes (i) all projects financed in whole or in 14part with funds from the Environmental Protection Agency under 15the Illinois Renewable Fuels Development Program Act for which 16there is no project labor agreement; (ii) all work performed 17pursuant to a public private agreement under the Public 18Private Agreements for the Illiana Expressway Act or the 19Public-Private Agreements for the South Suburban Airport Act; 20(iii) all projects undertaken under a public-private agreement 21under the Public-Private Partnerships for Transportation Act 22or the Department of Natural Resources World Shooting and 23Recreational Complex Act; and (iv) all transportation 24facilities undertaken under a design-build contract or a 25Construction Manager/General Contractor contract under the 26Innovations for Transportation Infrastructure Act. "Public   HB3753- 3 -LRB104 10561 SPS 20637 b1works" also includes all projects at leased facility property 2used for airport purposes under Section 35 of the Local 3Government Facility Lease Act. "Public works" also includes 4the construction of a new wind power facility by a business 5designated as a High Impact Business under Section 65.5(a)(3)(E) and the construction of a new utility-scale solar 7power facility by a business designated as a High Impact 8Business under Section 5.5(a)(3)(E-5) of the Illinois 9Enterprise Zone Act. "Public works" also includes electric 10vehicle charging station projects financed pursuant to the 11Electric Vehicle Act and renewable energy projects required to 12pay the prevailing wage pursuant to the Illinois Power Agency 13Act. "Public works" also includes power washing projects by a 14public body or paid for wholly or in part out of public funds 15in which steam or pressurized water, with or without added 16abrasives or chemicals, is used to remove paint or other 17coatings, oils or grease, corrosion, or debris from a surface 18or to prepare a surface for a coating. "Public works" does not 19include work done directly by any public utility company, 20whether or not done under public supervision or direction, or 21paid for wholly or in part out of public funds. "Public works" 22also includes construction projects performed by a third party 23contracted by any public utility, as described in subsection 24(a) of Section 2.1, in public rights-of-way, as defined in 25Section 21-201 of the Public Utilities Act, whether or not 26done under public supervision or direction, or paid for wholly   HB3753- 4 -LRB104 10561 SPS 20637 b1or in part out of public funds. "Public works" also includes 2construction projects that exceed 15 aggregate miles of new 3fiber optic cable, performed by a third party contracted by 4any public utility, as described in subsection (b) of Section 52.1, in public rights-of-way, as defined in Section 21-201 of 6the Public Utilities Act, whether or not done under public 7supervision or direction, or paid for wholly or in part out of 8public funds. "Public works" also includes any corrective 9action performed pursuant to Title XVI of the Environmental 10Protection Act for which payment from the Underground Storage 11Tank Fund is requested. "Public works" also includes all 12construction projects involving fixtures or permanent 13attachments affixed to light poles that are owned by a public 14body, including street light poles, traffic light poles, and 15other lighting fixtures, whether or not done under public 16supervision or direction, or paid for wholly or in part out of 17public funds, unless the project is performed by employees 18employed directly by the public body. "Public works" also 19includes work performed subject to the Mechanical Insulation 20Energy and Safety Assessment Act. "Public works" also includes 21the removal, hauling, and transportation of biosolids, lime 22sludge, and lime residue from a water treatment plant or 23facility and the disposal of biosolids, lime sludge, and lime 24residue removed from a water treatment plant or facility at a 25landfill. "Public works" does not include projects undertaken 26by the owner at an owner-occupied single-family residence or   HB3753- 5 -LRB104 10561 SPS 20637 b1at an owner-occupied unit of a multi-family residence. "Public 2works" does not include work performed for soil and water 3conservation purposes on agricultural lands, whether or not 4done under public supervision or paid for wholly or in part out 5of public funds, done directly by an owner or person who has 6legal control of those lands. 7    "Construction" means all work on public works involving 8laborers, workers or mechanics. This includes any maintenance, 9repair, assembly, or disassembly work performed on equipment 10whether owned, leased, or rented.11    "Trucking broker" means an individual or business entity, 12the activities of which include, but are not limited to:13        (1) contracting to provide trucking services in the 14    construction industry to users of those services;15        (2) contracting to obtain such service from providers 16    of trucking services;17        (3) dispatching the providers of the services to do 18    work as required by the users of such services;19        (4) receiving payment from the users in consideration 20    of the trucking services provided; and21        (5) making payment to the providers for the services.22    "Trucking firm" means any legal business entity that owns 23one or more vehicles and hires the vehicles out for services to 24trucking brokers or contractors on public works projects.25    "Independent truck owner-operator" means an individual, 26partnership, or principal stockholder of a corporation that   HB3753- 6 -LRB104 10561 SPS 20637 b1owns or holds a vehicle under lease and that contracts that 2vehicle and the owner's services to an entity which provides 3construction services to a public works project.4    "Ready-mixed concrete" means concrete that is manufactured 5according to a set recipe for incorporation into a public 6works project.7    "Aggregate" or "excavated materials" includes, but is not 8limited to, rock, gravel, sand, pebbles, dirt, soil, clay, 9bitumen, cultured and polymer materials, cement, concrete, 10asphalt, slag, grindings, and recycled materials.11    "Stockpile" means aggregate or excavated materials that 12are placed in a location for temporary storage when all or 13substantially all of the aggregate or excavated material is 14relocated by loading and hauling it to another location for 15final placement.16    "Transportation" means any required hauling activities on 17the site of, or to or from, a public works project or stockpile 18regardless of whether the activity is performed by the prime 19contractor, subcontractor, trucking broker, trucking firm, 20independent truck owner-operator, or employee or agent of any 21of the foregoing entities and regardless of which entity or 22person hires or contracts with another.23    "Transportation of ready-mixed concrete" means receiving 24the concrete at the factory or batching plant, hauling and 25delivery to a public works project, and the return trip to the 26factory or batching plant, whether or not the factory or   HB3753- 7 -LRB104 10561 SPS 20637 b1batching plant is mobile or in a fixed location.2    "Transportation of aggregate or excavated materials" 3includes, but is not limited to, work, as required by the users 4of the services, for:5        (1) the hauling of any or all stockpiled materials on 6    the project work site to other locations on the same 7    project even if the trucks leave the work site at some 8    point;9        (2) the delivery of materials from any facility or any 10    stockpile to the project and the return haul to the 11    starting location either empty or loaded;12        (3) the delivery of materials from another 13    construction project site to the public works project and 14    the return haul empty or loaded;15        (4) the hauling required to remove any materials from 16    the public works project to a location off the project 17    site and the return haul either empty or loaded; and18        (5) the delivery of materials by an employee of a 19    seller or supplier and the return haul to the off-site 20    facility or any stockpile empty or loaded by an employee 21    of the seller or supplier. 22    The hauling of aggregate or excavated materials by 23employees of a contractor or subcontractor that operates an 24asphalt or concrete plant, that was moved into a gravel pit, 25borrow pit, or other location not on the project, primarily to 26serve public works projects is considered work under the   HB3753- 8 -LRB104 10561 SPS 20637 b1contract. 2    "Locality" means the county where the physical work upon 3public works is performed, except (1) that if there is not 4available in the county a sufficient number of competent 5skilled laborers, workers and mechanics to construct the 6public works efficiently and properly, "locality" includes any 7other county nearest the one in which the work or construction 8is to be performed and from which such persons may be obtained 9in sufficient numbers to perform the work and (2) that, with 10respect to contracts for highway work with the Department of 11Transportation of this State, "locality" may at the discretion 12of the Secretary of the Department of Transportation be 13construed to include two or more adjacent counties from which 14workers may be accessible for work on such construction.15    "Public body" means the State or any officer, board or 16commission of the State or any political subdivision or 17department thereof, or any institution supported in whole or 18in part by public funds, and includes every county, city, 19town, village, township, school district, irrigation, utility, 20reclamation improvement or other district and every other 21political subdivision, district or municipality of the state 22whether such political subdivision, municipality or district 23operates under a special charter or not.24    "Labor organization" means an organization that is the 25exclusive representative of an employer's employees recognized 26or certified pursuant to the National Labor Relations Act.   HB3753- 9 -LRB104 10561 SPS 20637 b1    The terms "general prevailing rate of hourly wages", 2"general prevailing rate of wages" or "prevailing rate of 3wages" when used in this Act mean the hourly cash wages plus 4annualized fringe benefits for training and apprenticeship 5programs approved by the U.S. Department of Labor, Bureau of 6Apprenticeship and Training, health and welfare, insurance, 7vacations and pensions paid generally, in the locality in 8which the work is being performed, to employees engaged in 9work of a similar character on public works, and for those who 10own, such as an independent owner-operator, and operate a 11truck and are engaged in the transportation of ready-mixed 12concrete or transportation of aggregate or excavated 13materials, the prevailing rate, shall, in addition, include 14the equipment rate established by the Illinois Department of 15Transportation associated with the nature of the equipment 16operated and the rental rate paid for truck hire by those who 17own or operate a truck, whichever is applicable.18(Source: P.A. 102-9, eff. 1-1-22; 102-444, eff. 8-20-21; 19102-673, eff. 11-30-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1094, eff. 206-15-22; 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-327, eff. 1-1-24; 103-346, 21eff. 1-1-24; 103-359, eff. 7-28-23; 103-447, eff. 8-4-23; 22103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 23    (820 ILCS 130/3)  (from Ch. 48, par. 39s-3)24    Sec. 3. Not less than the general prevailing rate of 25hourly wages for work of a similar character on public works in   HB3753- 10 -LRB104 10561 SPS 20637 b1the locality in which the work is performed, and not less than 2the general prevailing rate of hourly wages for legal holiday 3and overtime work, shall be paid to all laborers, workers and 4mechanics employed by or on behalf of any public body engaged 5in the construction or demolition of public works. This 6includes any maintenance, repair, assembly, or disassembly 7work performed on equipment whether owned, leased, or rented. 8All Only such laborers, workers, and mechanics as are directly 9employed by contractors or subcontractors in actual 10construction work on the site of the building or construction 11job shall be deemed to be employed upon public works. The 12transportation of ready-mixed concrete and transportation of 13aggregate or excavated materials to the job site or stockpile 14shall be deemed to be employed in construction upon public 15works. Laborers , and laborers, workers, and mechanics 16otherwise engaged in the transportation of materials and 17equipment to or from the site, but not including the 18transportation by the sellers and suppliers or the manufacture 19or processing of materials or equipment, in the execution of 20any contract or contracts for public works with any public 21body shall not be deemed to be employed upon public works. The 22wage for a tradesman performing maintenance is equivalent to 23that of a tradesman engaged in construction or demolition.24(Source: P.A. 95-341, eff. 8-21-07; 96-186, eff. 1-1-10.) 25    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 26becoming law.